Utah statutes.
75-3-912.   Private agreements among successors to decedent binding on
personal representative.
Subject to the rights of creditors and taxing authorities, competent
successors may agree among themselves to alter the interests, shares, or
amounts to which they are entitled under the will of the decedent, or under
the laws of intestacy, in any way that they provide in a written contract
executed by all who are affected by its provisions. The personal
representative shall abide by the terms of the agreement, subject to his
obligation to administer the estate for the benefit of creditors, to pay all
taxes and costs of administration, and to carry out the responsibilities of
his office for the benefit of any successors of the decedent who are not
parties. Personal representatives of decedents' estates are not required to
see to the performance of trusts if the trustee thereof is another person who
is willing to accept the trust. Accordingly, trustees of a testamentary trust
are successors for the purposes of this section. Nothing contained in this
section relieves trustees of any duties owed to beneficiaries of trusts.
